Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.570

Acts against animals in research or educational facilities.

(1) Joint and several liability for damages shall apply to persons and organizations that commit an intentional tort by (a) taking, releasing, destroying, contaminating, or damaging any animal or animals kept in a research or educational facility, where the animal or animals are used or to be used for medical research or other research purposes, or for educational purposes; or (b) destroying or damaging any records, equipment, research product, or other thing pertaining to such animal or animals.

(2) Any person or organization that plans or assists in the development of a plan to commit an intentional tort covered by subsection (1) of this section is liable for damages to the same extent as a person who has committed the tort. However, a person or organization that assists in the development of a plan is not liable under this subsection, if, at the time of providing the assistance the person or organization does not know, or have reason to know, that the assistance is promoting the commission of the tort. Membership in a liable organization does not in itself establish the member's liability under this subsection. The common law defense of prior renunciation is allowed in actions brought under this subsection.

(3) In any case where damages are awarded under this section, the court shall award to the plaintiff all costs of the litigation, including reasonable attorneys' fees, investigation costs, and court costs, and shall impose on any liable party a civil fine of not to exceed one hundred thousand dollars to be paid to the plaintiff.

[ 1991 c 325 s 3.]

NOTES:

Severability—1991 c 325: See note following RCW 9.08.080.

Criminal acts against animal facilities: RCW 9.08.080, 9.08.090.